pt-BR: Tipo de autógrafo: Arte; Automotivo; Beisebol; Basquete; Boxe; Celebridades; Futebol americano; História; Hóquei; Literário; Música; Político; Ciência; Futebol; Esportes; Tênis; Outro
vi: Loại chữ ký: Nghệ thuật; Máy móc tự động; Bóng chày; Bóng rổ; Quyền anh; Người nổi tiếng; Bóng đá; Lịch sử; Khúc côn cầu; Văn học; Âm nhạc; Thuộc về chính trị; Khoa học; Bóng đá; Thể thao; Quần vợt; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de autograf: Artă; Automobile; Baseball; Baschetbal; Box; Celebrități; Fotbal; Istorie; Hochei; Literar; Muzică; Politic; Știință; Fotbal; Sportiv; Tenis; Altele
cs: Typ autogramu: Umění; Automobily; Baseball; Basketbal; Box; Celebrity; Fotbal; Historie; Hokej; Literatura; Hudba; Politika; Věda; Kopaná; Sporty; Tenis; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de autógrafo: Arte; Automóveis; Basebol; Basquetebol; Boxe; Celebridades; Futebol americano; História; Hóquei; Literário; Música; Político; Ciência; Futebol; Desportivo; Ténis; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta autograma: Umjetnost; Automobilizam; Bejzbol; Košarka; Boks; Poznati; Američki nogomet; Povijest; Hokej; Književnost; Glazba; Politika; Znanost; Nogomet; Sport; Tenis; Ostalo
ja: サインタイプ: アート; 自動車; 野球; バスケットボール; ボクシング; 有名人; フットボール; 歴史; ホッケー; 文学; 音楽; 政治; 科学; サッカー; スポーツ; テニス; その他
tr: İmza Türü: Sanat; Otomotiv; Beyzbol; Basketbol; Boks; Ünlüler; Futbol; Tarih; Hokey; Edebi; Müzik; Siyasi; Bilim; Futbol; Spor dalları; Tenis; Diğer
ru: Тип автографа: Искусство; Автомобили; Бейсбол; Баскетбол; Бокс; Знаменитости; Футбол; История; Хоккей; Литература; Музыка; Политика; Наука; Соккер; Спорт; Теннис; Другое
es: Tipo de autógrafo: Arte; Automóviles; Béisbol; Baloncesto; Boxeo; Celebridades; Fútbol; Historia; Hóckey; Literario; Música; Político; Ciencia; Fútbol; Deportes; Tenis; Otros
sv: Typ av autograf: Konst; Bil; Baseboll; Basketboll; Boxning; Kändisar; Fotboll; Historia; Hockey; Litterär; Musik; Politisk; Vetenskap; Fotboll; Sporter; Tennis; Övrigt
hu: Autogram típusa: Művészet; Autó; Baseball; Kosárlabda; Boksz; Hírességek; Futball; Történelem; Hoki; Irodalom; Zene; Politika; Tudomány; Futball; Sport; Tenisz; Egyéb
en: Autograph type: Art; Automotive; Baseball; Basketball; Boxing; Celebrities; Football; History; Hockey; Literary; Music; Political; Science; Soccer; Sports; Tennis; Other
fi: Nimikirjoitustyyppi: Taide; Autoilu; Pesäpallo; Koripallo; Nyrkkeily; Julkkikset; Jalkapallo; Historia; Jääkiekko; Kirjallisuus; Musiikki; Poliittinen; Tiede; Jalkapallo; Urheilu; Tennis; Muu
sk-SK: Typ autogramu: Umenie; Automobilový priemysel; Bejzbal; Basketbal; Box; Celebrity; Futbal; História; Hokej; Literárny; Hudba; Politika; Veda; Futbal; Šport; Tenis; Iné
bg-BG: Тип автограф: Изкуство; Автомобили; Бейзбол; Баскетбол; Бокс; Знаменитости; Футбол; История; Хокей; Литературен; Музика; Политически; Наука; Футбол; Спорт; Тенис; Други
lt-LT: Autografo tipas: Menas; Automobiliai; Beisbolas; Krepšinis; Boksas; Įžymybės; Futbolas; Istorija; Ritulys; Literatūrinis; Muzika; Politinis; Mokslas; Futbolas; Sportas; Tenisas; Kita
de: Autogrammtyp: Kunst; Automobil; Baseball; Basketball; Boxen; Prominente; Fußball; Geschichte; Hockey; Literarisch; Musik; Politisch; Wissenschaft; Fußball; Sportarten; Tennis; Sonstiges
ko: 사인 유형: 미술; 자동차; 야구; 농구; 권투; 연예인; 풋볼; 역사; 하키; 문학; 음악; 정치; 과학; 축구; 스포츠; 테니스; 기타
it: Tipo di autografo: Arte; Settore automobilistico; Baseball; Basket; Boxe; Celebrità; Calcio; Storia; Hockey; Letterario; Musica; Politico; Scienza; Calcio; Sport; Tennis; Altro
nl: Handtekeningtype: Kunst; Automobiel; Baseball; Basketbal; Boksen; Beroemdheden; Voetbal; Geschiedenis; Hockey; Literair; Muziek; Politiek; Wetenschap; Voetbal; Sporten; Tennis; Andere
da: Autograftype: Kunst; Biler; Baseball; Basketball; Boksning; Kendte personer; Fodbold; Historie; Hockey; Litteratur; Musik; Politik; Videnskab; Fodbold; Sport; Tennis; Andet
fr: Type d’autographe: Art; Automobile; Base-ball; Basket-ball; Boxe; Célébrités; Football américain; Histoire; Hockey; Littéraire; Musique; Politique; Sciences; Football; Sports; Tennis; Autre
nb: Autograftype: Kunst; Kjøretøy; Baseball; Basketball; Boksing; Kjendiser; Amerikansk fotball; Historie; Hockey; Litterær; Musikk; Politisk; Vitenskap; Fotball; Sport; Tennis; Annet
th: ประเภทลายเซ็นต์: ศิลปะ; ยานยนต์; เบสบอล; บาสเก็ตบอล; มวย; คนดังต่างๆ; อเมริกันฟุตบอล; ประวัติศาสตร์; ฮอกกี้; วรรณกรรม; ดนตรี; การเมือง; วิทศาสตร์; ฟุตบอล; กีฬาต่างๆ; เทนนิส; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ autografu: Sztuka; Motoryzacyjny; Baseball; Koszykówka; Boks; Celebryci; Piłka nożna; Historia; Hokej; Literacki; Muzyczne; Polityczny; Nauki ścisłe; Piłka nożna; Sport; Tenis; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta avtograma: Umetnost; Avtomobilizem; Bejzbol; Košarka; Boks; Znane osebnosti; Ameriški nogomet; Zgodovina; Hokej; Književnost; Glasba; Politika; Znanost; Nogomet; Šport; Tenis; Drugo
el: Τύπος αυτόγραφου: Τέχνη; Αυτοκίνητα; Μπέιζμπολ; Μπάσκετ; Πυγμαχία; Διασημότητες; Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο; Ιστορία; Χόκεϊ; Λογοτεχνία; Μουσική; Πολιτική; Επιστήμη; Ποδόσφαιρο; Αθλητισμός; Τένις; Άλλο
zh-TW: 親筆簽名類型: 藝術; 汽車; 棒球; 籃球; 拳擊; 名人; 足球; 記錄; 曲棍球; 文學; 音樂; 政治; 科學; 足球; 體育; 網球; 其他
zh-CN: 亲笔签名类型: 艺术; 汽车主题; 棒球; 篮球用品; 拳击; 名流; 橄榄球; 历史; 曲棍球; 文学; 音乐; 政治; 科学; 足球用品; 体育; 网球用品; 其他